Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 62 O.S. 2021, Section 34.103, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 34.103. A. In addition to any other duties prescribed


by law, at the meeting required by Section 23 of Article X of the


Oklahoma Constitution to be held in February of 2017, and at the


February meeting of the State Board of Equalization each year


thereafter, the State Board of Equalization shall certify:



Req. No. 68 Page 1


1. For the revenue derived from the tax levied on oil pursuant


to Section 1001 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes, which would


otherwise be apportioned to the General Revenue Fund, the average


annual amount of actual revenue apportioned to the General Revenue


Fund for the immediately preceding five (5) complete fiscal years.


For any year after the first year during which a deposit to the


Revenue Stabilization Fund is made, the amount of any deposit to the


Revenue Stabilization Fund shall be disregarded for purposes of this


paragraph and the average shall be computed using the total amount


of revenue that was available to be apportioned to the General


Revenue Fund for the applicable period of time;


2. For the revenue derived from the tax levied on natural gas


pursuant to Section 1001 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes, which


would otherwise be apportioned to the General Revenue Fund, the


average annual amount of actual revenue apportioned to the General


Revenue Fund for the previous five (5) fiscal years. For any year


after the first year during which a deposit to the Revenue


Stabilization Fund is made, the amount of any deposit to the Revenue


Stabilization Fund shall be disregarded for purposes of this


paragraph and the average shall be computed using the total amount


of revenue that was available to be apportioned to the General


Revenue Fund for the applicable period of time; and


3. For the revenue derived from the corporate income tax levied


pursuant to Section 2355 of Title 68 the Oklahoma Statutes, which

Req. No. 68 Page 2


would otherwise be apportioned to the General Revenue Fund, the


average annual amount of actual revenue apportioned to the General


Revenue Fund for the previous five (5) fiscal years. For any year


after the first year during which a deposit to the Revenue


Stabilization Fund is made, the amount of any deposit to the Revenue


Stabilization Fund shall be disregarded for purposes of this


paragraph and the average shall be computed using the total amount


of revenue that was available to be apportioned to the General


Revenue Fund for the applicable period of time.


B. If the amount of revenue available for apportionment to the


General Revenue Fund for the next ensuing fiscal year exceeds the


amounts certified pursuant to paragraph 1 or 2 of subsection A of


this section, with respect to each such revenue source, one hundred


percent (100%) of such amount in excess of the separately computed


five-year average, which would otherwise be apportioned to the


General Revenue Fund, shall be deposited to the credit of the


Revenue Stabilization Fund.


C. If the amount of revenue available for apportionment to the


General Revenue Fund for the next ensuing fiscal year exceeds the


amount certified pursuant to paragraph 3 of subsection A of this


section:


1. Twenty-five percent (25%) of such amount in excess of the


five-year average, which would otherwise be apportioned to the


General Revenue Fund, shall be deposited to the credit of the

Req. No. 68 Page 3


Constitutional Reserve Fund unless such deposit would exceed the


maximum balance permitted pursuant to Section 23 of Article X of the


Oklahoma Constitution and in such case the amount in excess of the


maximum balance shall be deposited to the credit of the Revenue


Stabilization Fund; and


2. Seventy-five percent (75%) of such amount in excess of the


five-year average, which would otherwise be apportioned to the


General Revenue Fund, shall be deposited to the credit of the


Revenue Stabilization Fund, together with any amount required for


deposit pursuant to the provisions of paragraph 1 of this


subsection.


D. In addition to any other duties prescribed by law, at the


meeting required by Section 23 of Article X of the Oklahoma


Constitution to be held in February of 2026, and at the February


meeting of the State Board of Equalization each year thereafter, the


State Board of Equalization shall certify:


1. For the revenue derived from all taxes levied by this state,


an itemized estimate of collections for the ensuing fiscal year;


2. For the revenue derived from all taxes levied by this state,


whether the difference between the itemized estimate certified


pursuant to paragraph 1 of this subsection and the actual


collections in fiscal year 2024 exceeds Four Hundred Million Dollars


($400,000,000.00) in growth, until a reduction in the marginal tax



Req. No. 68 Page 4


rates occurs pursuant to subsection D of Section 2355 of Title 68 of


the Oklahoma Statutes; and


3. For the revenue derived from all taxes levied by this state,


whether the difference between the itemized estimate certified


pursuant to paragraph 1 of this subsection and the actual


collections in the latest full fiscal year before the most recent


reduction in the marginal tax rates pursuant to subsection D of


Section 2355 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes exceeds Four


Hundred Million Dollars ($400,000,000.00) in growth.


On July 1, 2035, and every ten (10) years thereafter, the


threshold of Four Hundred Million Dollars ($400,000,000.00) provided


in paragraphs 2 and 3 of this subsection shall be adjusted for


inflation to reflect the percentage change in the Consumer Price


Index published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United


States Department of Labor for that period.


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 2355, as


last amended by Section 1, Chapter 27, 1st Extraordinary Session,


O.S.L. 2023 (68 O.S. Supp. 2024, Section 2355), is amended to read


as follows:


Section 2355. A. Individuals. For all taxable years beginning


after December 31, 1998, and before January 1, 2006, a tax is hereby


imposed upon the Oklahoma taxable income of every resident or


nonresident individual, which tax shall be computed at the option of


the taxpayer under one of the two following methods:

Req. No. 68 Page 5


1. METHOD 1.


a. Single individuals and married individuals filing


separately not deducting federal income tax:


(1) 1/2% tax on first $1,000.00 or part thereof,


(2) 1% tax on next $1,500.00 or part thereof,


(3) 2% tax on next $1,250.00 or part thereof,


(4) 3% tax on next $1,150.00 or part thereof,


(5) 4% tax on next $1,300.00 or part thereof,


(6) 5% tax on next $1,500.00 or part thereof,


(7) 6% tax on next $2,300.00 or part thereof, and


(8) (a) for taxable years beginning after December


31, 1998, and before January 1, 2002, 6.75%


tax on the remainder,


(b) for taxable years beginning on or after


January 1, 2002, and before January 1, 2004,


7% tax on the remainder, and


(c) for taxable years beginning on or after


January 1, 2004, 6.65% tax on the remainder.


b. Married individuals filing jointly and surviving


spouse to the extent and in the manner that a


surviving spouse is permitted to file a joint return


under the provisions of the Internal Revenue Code and


heads of households as defined in the Internal Revenue


Code not deducting federal income tax:

Req. No. 68 Page 6


(1) 1/2% tax on first $2,000.00 or part thereof,


(2) 1% tax on next $3,000.00 or part thereof,


(3) 2% tax on next $2,500.00 or part thereof,


(4) 3% tax on next $2,300.00 or part thereof,


(5) 4% tax on next $2,400.00 or part thereof,


(6) 5% tax on next $2,800.00 or part thereof,


(7) 6% tax on next $6,000.00 or part thereof, and


(8) (a) for taxable years beginning after December


31, 1998, and before January 1, 2002, 6.75%


tax on the remainder,


(b) for taxable years beginning on or after


January 1, 2002, and before January 1, 2004,


7% tax on the remainder, and


(c) for taxable years beginning on or after


January 1, 2004, 6.65% tax on the remainder.


2. METHOD 2.


a. Single individuals and married individuals filing


separately deducting federal income tax:


(1) 1/2% tax on first $1,000.00 or part thereof,


(2) 1% tax on next $1,500.00 or part thereof,


(3) 2% tax on next $1,250.00 or part thereof,


(4) 3% tax on next $1,150.00 or part thereof,


(5) 4% tax on next $1,200.00 or part thereof,


(6) 5% tax on next $1,400.00 or part thereof,

Req. No. 68 Page 7


(7) 6% tax on next $1,500.00 or part thereof,


(8) 7% tax on next $1,500.00 or part thereof,


(9) 8% tax on next $2,000.00 or part thereof,


(10) 9% tax on next $3,500.00 or part thereof, and


(11) 10% tax on the remainder.


b. Married individuals filing jointly and surviving


spouse to the extent and in the manner that a


surviving spouse is permitted to file a joint return


under the provisions of the Internal Revenue Code and


heads of households as defined in the Internal Revenue


Code deducting federal income tax:


(1) 1/2% tax on the first $2,000.00 or part thereof,


(2) 1% tax on the next $3,000.00 or part thereof,


(3) 2% tax on the next $2,500.00 or part thereof,


(4) 3% tax on the next $1,400.00 or part thereof,


(5) 4% tax on the next $1,500.00 or part thereof,


(6) 5% tax on the next $1,600.00 or part thereof,


(7) 6% tax on the next $1,250.00 or part thereof,


(8) 7% tax on the next $1,750.00 or part thereof,


(9) 8% tax on the next $3,000.00 or part thereof,


(10) 9% tax on the next $6,000.00 or part thereof, and


(11) 10% tax on the remainder.


B. Individuals. For all taxable years beginning on or after


January 1, 2008, and ending any tax year which begins after December

Req. No. 68 Page 8


31, 2015, for which the determination required pursuant to Sections


2355.1F and 5 Section 2355.1G of this act title is made by the


State Board of Equalization, a tax is hereby imposed upon the


Oklahoma taxable income of every resident or nonresident individual,


which tax shall be computed as follows:


1. Single individuals and married individuals filing


separately:


(a) 1/2% tax on first $1,000.00 or part thereof,


(b) 1% tax on next $1,500.00 or part thereof,


(c) 2% tax on next $1,250.00 or part thereof,


(d) 3% tax on next $1,150.00 or part thereof,


(e) 4% tax on next $2,300.00 or part thereof,


(f) 5% tax on next $1,500.00 or part thereof,


(g) 5.50% tax on the remainder for the 2008 tax year and


any subsequent tax year unless the rate prescribed by


subparagraph (h) of this paragraph is in effect, and


(h) 5.25% tax on the remainder for the 2009 and subsequent


tax years. The decrease in the top marginal


individual income tax rate otherwise authorized by


this subparagraph shall be contingent upon the


determination required to be made by the State Board


of Equalization pursuant to Section 2355.1A of this


title.



Req. No. 68 Page 9


2. Married individuals filing jointly and surviving spouse to


the extent and in the manner that a surviving spouse is permitted to


file a joint return under the provisions of the Internal Revenue


Code and heads of households as defined in the Internal Revenue


Code:


(a) 1/2% tax on first $2,000.00 or part thereof,


(b) 1% tax on next $3,000.00 or part thereof,


(c) 2% tax on next $2,500.00 or part thereof,


(d) 3% tax on next $2,300.00 or part thereof,


(e) 4% tax on next $2,400.00 or part thereof,


(f) 5% tax on next $2,800.00 or part thereof,


(g) 5.50% tax on the remainder for the 2008 tax year and


any subsequent tax year unless the rate prescribed by


subparagraph (h) of this paragraph is in effect, and


(h) 5.25% tax on the remainder for the 2009 and subsequent


tax years. The decrease in the top marginal


individual income tax rate otherwise authorized by


this subparagraph shall be contingent upon the


determination required to be made by the State Board


of Equalization pursuant to Section 2355.1A of this


title.


C. Individuals. For all taxable years beginning on or after


January 1, 2024, a tax is hereby imposed upon the Oklahoma taxable



Req. No. 68 Page 10


income of every resident or nonresident individual, which tax shall


be computed as follows:


1. Single individuals and married individuals filing


separately:


(a) 0.25% tax on first $1,000.00 or part thereof,


(b) 0.75% tax on next $1,500.00 or part thereof,


(c) 1.75% tax on next $1,250.00 or part thereof,


(d) 2.75% tax on next $1,150.00 or part thereof,


(e) 3.75% tax on next $2,300.00 or part thereof, and


(f) 4.75% tax on the remainder.


2. Married individuals filing jointly and surviving spouse to


the extent and in the manner that a surviving spouse is permitted to


file a joint return under the provisions of the Internal Revenue


Code and heads of households as defined in the Internal Revenue


Code:


(a) 0.25% tax on first $2,000.00 or part thereof,


(b) 0.75% tax on next $3,000.00 or part thereof,


(c) 1.75% tax on next $2,500.00 or part thereof,


(d) 2.75% tax on next $2,300.00 or part thereof,


(e) 3.75% tax on next $4,600.00 or part thereof, and


(f) 4.75% tax on the remainder.


No deduction for federal income taxes paid shall be allowed to


any taxpayer to arrive at taxable income.



Req. No. 68 Page 11


D. Individuals. Except as provided for in subsection E of this


section, for all taxable years beginning on or after January 1,


2025, a tax is hereby imposed upon the Oklahoma taxable income of


every resident or nonresident individual, which tax shall be


computed as follows:


1. Single individuals and married individuals filing


separately:


(a) 0% tax on first $1,000.00 or part thereof,


(b) 0.5% tax on next $1,500.00 or part thereof,


(c) 1.5% tax on next $1,250.00 or part thereof,


(d) 2.5% tax on next $1,150.00 or part thereof,


(e) 3.5% tax on next $2,300.00 or part thereof, and


(f) 4.5% tax on the remainder.


2. Married individuals filing jointly and surviving spouse to


the extent and in the manner that a surviving spouse is permitted to


file a joint return under the provisions of the Internal Revenue


Code and heads of households as defined in the Internal Revenue


Code:


(a) 0% tax on first $2,000.00 or part thereof,


(b) 0.5% tax on next $3,000.00 or part thereof,


(c) 1.5% tax on next $2,500.00 or part thereof,


(d) 2.5% tax on next $2,300.00 or part thereof,


(e) 3.5% tax on next $4,600.00 or part thereof, and


(f) 4.5% tax on the remainder.

Req. No. 68 Page 12


No deduction for federal income taxes paid shall be allowed to


any taxpayer to arrive at taxable income.


E. If the difference between collections exceeds Four Hundred


Million Dollars ($400,000,000.00) in growth, as adjusted for


inflation pursuant to subsection D of Section 34.103 of Title 62 of


the Oklahoma Statutes, and as certified by the State Board of


Equalization pursuant to paragraph 2 of subsection D of Section


34.103 of Title 62 of the Oklahoma Statutes, the marginal tax rates


provided in paragraphs 1 and 2 of subsection D of this section shall


each be reduced by twenty-five hundredths (0.25) of a percentage


point unless the rate equals zero percent (0%) for the immediate


succeeding tax year and subsequent tax years. Each successive


certification of growth exceeding Four Hundred Million Dollars


($400,000,000.00) by the Board, as adjusted for inflation, shall


further reduce the marginal tax rates by twenty-five hundredths


(0.25) of a percentage point until the rate equals zero percent (0%)


in the immediate succeeding tax year and subsequent tax years. If a


revenue failure is declared pursuant to the provisions of Section


34.49 of Title 62 of the Oklahoma Statutes prior to the end of the


calendar year in which the Board makes a certification pursuant to


paragraphs 2 and 3 of subsection D of Section 34.103 of Title 62 of


the Oklahoma Statutes, the reduction in marginal tax rates, as


provided for in this subsection, shall not occur until a subsequent



Req. No. 68 Page 13


certification is made by the Board pursuant to paragraphs 2 and 3 of


subsection D of Section 34.103 of Title 62 of the Oklahoma Statutes.


F. Nonresident aliens. In lieu of the rates set forth in


subsection A above, there shall be imposed on nonresident aliens, as


defined in the Internal Revenue Code, a tax of eight percent (8%)


instead of thirty percent (30%) as used in the Internal Revenue


Code, with respect to the Oklahoma taxable income of such


nonresident aliens as determined under the provision of the Oklahoma


Income Tax Act.


Every payer of amounts covered by this subsection shall deduct


and withhold from such amounts paid each payee an amount equal to


eight percent (8%) thereof. Every payer required to deduct and


withhold taxes under this subsection shall for each quarterly period


on or before the last day of the month following the close of each


such quarterly period, pay over the amount so withheld as taxes to


the Oklahoma Tax Commission, and shall file a return with each such


payment. Such return shall be in such form as the Tax Commission


shall prescribe. Every payer required under this subsection to


deduct and withhold a tax from a payee shall, as to the total


amounts paid to each payee during the calendar year, furnish to such


payee, on or before January 31, of the succeeding year, a written


statement showing the name of the payer, the name of the payee and


the payee’s Social Security account number, if any, the total amount


paid subject to taxation, and the total amount deducted and withheld

Req. No. 68 Page 14


as tax and such other information as the Tax Commission may require.


Any payer who fails to withhold or pay to the Tax Commission any


sums herein required to be withheld or paid shall be personally and


individually liable therefor to the State of Oklahoma this state.


E. G. Corporations. For all taxable years beginning after


December 31, 2021, a tax is hereby imposed upon the Oklahoma taxable


income of every corporation doing business within this state or


deriving income from sources within this state in an amount equal to


four percent (4%) thereof.


There shall be no additional Oklahoma income tax imposed on


accumulated taxable income or on undistributed personal holding


company income as those terms are defined in the Internal Revenue


Code.


F. H. Certain foreign corporations. In lieu of the tax imposed


in the first paragraph of subsection D F of this section, for all


taxable years beginning after December 31, 2021, there shall be


imposed on foreign corporations, as defined in the Internal Revenue


Code, a tax of four percent (4%) instead of thirty percent (30%) as


used in the Internal Revenue Code, where such income is received


from sources within Oklahoma this state, in accordance with the


provisions of the Internal Revenue Code and the Oklahoma Income Tax


Act.


Every payer of amounts covered by this subsection shall deduct


and withhold from such amounts paid each payee an amount equal to

Req. No. 68 Page 15


four percent (4%) thereof. Every payer required to deduct and


withhold taxes under this subsection shall for each quarterly period


on or before the last day of the month following the close of each


such quarterly period, pay over the amount so withheld as taxes to


the Tax Commission, and shall file a return with each such payment.


Such return shall be in such form as the Tax Commission shall


prescribe. Every payer required under this subsection to deduct and


withhold a tax from a payee shall, as to the total amounts paid to


each payee during the calendar year, furnish to such payee, on or


before January 31, of the succeeding year, a written statement


showing the name of the payer, the name of the payee and the payee’s


Social Security account number, if any, the total amounts paid


subject to taxation, the total amount deducted and withheld as tax,


and such other information as the Tax Commission may require. Any


payer who fails to withhold or pay to the Tax Commission any sums


herein required to be withheld or paid shall be personally and


individually liable therefor to the State of Oklahoma.


G. I. Fiduciaries. A tax is hereby imposed upon the Oklahoma


taxable income of every trust and estate at the same rates as are


provided in subsection B or, C, D, or E of this section for single


individuals. Fiduciaries are not allowed a deduction for any


federal income tax paid.


H. J. Tax rate tables. For all taxable years beginning after


December 31, 1991, in lieu of the tax imposed by subsection A, B or,

Req. No. 68 Page 16


C, D, or E of this section, as applicable there is hereby imposed


for each taxable year on the taxable income of every individual,


whose taxable income for such taxable year does not exceed the


ceiling amount, a tax determined under tables, applicable to such


taxable year which shall be prescribed by the Tax Commission and


which shall be in such form as it determines appropriate. In the


table so prescribed, the amounts of the tax shall be computed on the


basis of the rates prescribed by subsection A, B or, C, D, or E of


this section. For purposes of this subsection, the term “ceiling


amount” means, with respect to any taxpayer, the amount determined


by the Tax Commission for the tax rate category in which such


taxpayer falls.


SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-68 QD 11/15/2024 11:07:03 AM













Req. No. 68 Page 17